Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Mississippi Natural Heritage

§ 49-5-141.
Short title.

Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Natural Heritage Law of 1978.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978).

§ 49-5-143.
Legislative findings and declaration.

The Legislature finds and declares that there is a need for additional organized, accessible information to identify and make known the types and locations of plant and animal life, geological areas and other natural areas in this state.

The Legislature further finds and declares that a system of protection and management of these areas should be implemented and maintained through a procedure of voluntary action by the owners of the property on which these areas may be located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1978).

§ 49-5-145.
Purpose.

The Legislature states that the purpose of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157 is to establish a registration procedure by which owners of natural areas may voluntarily agree to manage and protect the areas according to rules set forth by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

The Legislature states that the purpose of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157 is also to establish a dedication procedure by which owners of natural areas may voluntarily agree to convey any or all of their right, title and interest in the property to the State of Mississippi to be managed and protected by an appropriate agency designated by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks for the people of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 318; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 55, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-147.
Definitions.

For the purposes of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Committee” or “Wildlife Heritage Committee” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Dedicate” means the transfer to the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks of any estate, interest or right in any natural area to be held for the people of Mississippi in a manner provided in Section 49-5-155.

“Natural area” means an area of land, water or air, or combination thereof, which contains an element of the state’s natural diversity, including, but not limited to, individual plant or animal life, natural geological areas, habitats of endangered or threatened species, ecosystems or any other area of unique ecological, scientific or educational interest.

“Natural area preserve” means a natural area which is voluntarily dedicated.

“Register” means the act of agreement between the owner of a natural area and the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks for designation of the natural area and for its placement on the register of natural areas by voluntary agreement between the owner of the natural area and the commission.

“Register of natural areas” means a listing of natural areas which are being managed by the owner of the natural area according to the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 319; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 56, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-149.
Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To utilize inventory data compiled by the Mississippi Wildlife Heritage Program concerning the natural areas of the state;

To accept on behalf of the people of Mississippi any right, title or interest to any natural area;

To establish and maintain a register of natural areas;

To select natural areas for placement on the register of natural areas or for dedication as a natural area preserve, or both;

To provide for the management of natural area preserves by designating an appropriate agency to manage the preserve in accordance with the provisions set forth in the articles of dedication which establish the natural area as a natural area preserve;

To cooperate with any agency of the United States, the State of Mississippi and any other state, any political subdivision of this state and with private persons or organizations to implement the provisions of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157;

To discharge any other duty or action necessary to implement the provisions of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 57, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-151.
Register of natural areas.

The commission shall publish and revise at least annually a register of natural areas using the inventory of natural areas compiled by the Mississippi Wildlife Heritage Program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 58, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-153.
Registration of natural areas.

The owner of any natural area on the registry may, if the commission so agrees, register the natural area by executing a voluntary agreement with the commission for the owner to manage and protect the natural area according to the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission and to give the commission first option to purchase the natural area. If the owner agrees to register the area, he shall be given a certificate of registration and shall be committed to manage the area according to the terms of the agreement with the commission. The agreement may be terminated by either party after thirty (30) days written notice. The owner, upon termination, shall surrender the certificate; provided, however, the first option to purchase shall remain with the commission unless the commission shall relinquish the option in writing.

Any property acquired by the commission or any other agency of the state or political subdivision thereof pursuant to any other authority in law may be registered according to this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 59, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-5-155.
Dedication of natural areas to commission; exemption from ad valorem taxation.

The owner of any natural area may dedicate that area as a natural area preserve by executing with the commission articles of dedication. The articles shall transfer such portion of the owner’s estate as agreed upon by the owner and the commission to the commission for the people of Mississippi.

The commission may acquire articles of dedication for consideration or by donation, devise or bequest. The articles of dedication shall be recorded in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which any or all of the natural area is located before the area shall become a natural area preserve.

The commission may dedicate any property owned by the commission as natural area preserve by filing and recording articles of dedication in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which any or all of the area is located.

The articles of dedication shall contain:

Provisions for the management, custody and use of the natural area preserve;

Provisions which define the rights and privileges of the owner and the commission or the managing agency, including any rights of the owner related to his eligibility for an income tax credit authorized under Section27-7-22.22; and

Such other provisions as the owner or commission shall deem necessary to discharge the provisions of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157 or to complete the transfer.

The commission shall agree to no articles of dedication which do not provide for the protection, preservation and management of the natural area in a manner consistent with the intent and purposes of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157.

Any interest in real property owned by the commission in a natural area preserve shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxation levied by the State of Mississippi or any county or municipality or other political subdivision of this state. Any person who shall convey any interest in real property to the commission for the purposes set forth in Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157 shall be entitled to have the assessment of such property reduced by the amount of the value of the interest conveyed to the commission. The authorities responsible for determining and making the assessment shall also determine the value of the interest conveyed to the commission. This reduction in the assessment of such property shall terminate when the interest conveyed to the commission terminates.

The commission shall be the agency of the State of Mississippi primarily responsible for acquisition of natural area preserves, but no provision of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157 shall be construed to limit the commission’s authority to acquire other property. Any property acquired by the commission or any other agency of the state or political subdivision thereof pursuant to any other authority in law may be dedicated according to this section.

No provisions of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157 shall be construed to limit the authority of any other agency to acquire and dedicate natural areas according to the provisions of Sections 49-5-141 through 49-5-157.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 8; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 60; Laws, 2010, ch. 503, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2010.

§ 49-5-157.
Management, protection and inspection of natural area preserves.

A natural area preserve is held in trust by the State of Mississippi for present and future generations and shall be managed and protected according to the rules and regulations set forth by the commission. A natural area preserve is hereby declared to be at the highest, best and most important use for the public.

The commission shall inspect or provide for the inspection of at least annually, each natural area preserve to insure that the terms of the articles of dedication are being respected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 415, § 9; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 61, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).